Utah statutes.
10-19-301.   Plans and reports.
(1)  A municipal electric utility shall develop and maintain a plan for
implementing Subsection 10-19-201(1).
(2)  A progress report concerning a plan under Subsection (1) shall be filed
with the municipality's legislative body by January 1 of each of the years
2010, 2015, 2020, and 2024.
(3)  The progress report under Subsection (2) shall contain:
(a)  the actual and projected amount of qualifying electricity through 2025;
(b)  the source of qualifying electricity;
(c)  an estimate of the cost of achieving the target;
(d)  a discussion of conditions impacting the renewable energy source and
qualifying electricity markets; and
(e)  any recommendation for a suggested legislative or program change.
(4)  The plan and progress report required by Subsections (1) and (2) may
include procedures that will be used by the municipal electric utility to
identify and select any cost-effective renewable energy resource and
qualifying electricity.
(5)  By July 1, 2026, the municipal electric utility shall file a final
progress report demonstrating:
(a)  how Subsection 10-19-201(1) is satisfied for the year 2025; or
(b)  the reason why Subsection 10-19-201(1) is not satisfied for the year
2025, if it is not satisfied.
(6)  The plan and any progress report filed under this section shall be
publicly available at the municipal legislative body's office.
